California statutes. Public Resources Code
The commission shall carry out studies to determine if potential serious shortages of electrical, natural gas, or other sources of energy are likely to occur and shall make recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature concerning administrative and legislative actions required to avert possible energy supply emergencies or serious fuel shortages, including, but not limited to, energy conservation and energy development measures, to grant authority to specific governmental agencies or officers to take actions in the event of a sudden energy shortage, and to clarify and coordinate existing responsibilities for energy emergency actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25704.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Climate change has increased the frequency and intensity of extreme heat events and increasing levels of variable renewable energy resources necessitate planning for the net load, which is load minus variable renewables, peak in addition to peak load.

(2) There is a need to reassess how applicable authorities plan to have adequate resources to ensure reliability in all hours of the day. While certain capacity product requirements have been standardized through the Independent System Operator, such as local and flexible capacity obligations, and there have been discussions of increased or even minimum planning
 reserves margins, there is a need to consider modern metrics to assess the overall reliability performance of the Independent System Operator balancing authority area.

(b) On or before December 31, 2023, the commission shall, as part of a transparent public process that includes input from industry stakeholders, and in direct collaboration with representatives of local publicly owned electric utilities and the Independent System Operator, develop recommendations about approaches to determine an appropriate minimum planning reserve margin for local publicly owned electric utilities within the Independent System Operator balancing authority area sufficient to ensure each local publicly owned electric utility is adequately accounting for its contribution to reliability in the Independent System Operator balancing authority area. The approaches shall take into consideration climate change, extreme weather events, cost effectiveness, and
 feasibility, and may vary by utility type. The recommendations shall include an implementation timeline taking into account potential impacts on resource needs and availability of clean energy resources. These recommendations shall be used by local publicly owned electric utilities in conformance with subdivision (b) of Section 9620 of the Public Utilities Code. The commission shall from time to time revise, as appropriate and in accordance with the process set forth in this subdivision, the planning reserve margin recommendations to ensure that each local publicly owned electric utility is adequately accounting for its contribution to reliability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 14.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25705.

If the commission determines that all reasonable conservation, allocation, and service restriction measures may not alleviate an energy supply emergency, and upon a declaration by the Governor or by an act of the Legislature that a threat to public health, safety, and welfare exists and requires immediate action, the commission shall authorize the construction and use of generating facilities under such terms and conditions as specified by the commission to protect the public interest.

Within 60 days after the authorization of construction and use of such generating facilities, the commission shall issue a report detailing the full nature, extent, and estimated duration of the emergency situation and making recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature for further energy conservation and energy supply measures to alleviate the emergency situation as alternatives to use of such generating facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.1. Electric Program Investment Charge Fund [25710. - 25712.]

25710.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Electric Program Investment Charge” means the surcharge instituted by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Decision 11-12-035 or any subsequent decisions to collect funds for renewable energy programs and research, development, and demonstration programs.

(b) “Fund” means the portion of the Electric Program Investment Charge Fund created by Section 25711.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 97.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

25711.

For the purposes of implementing this chapter, the Electric Program Investment Charge Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(a) The commission shall administer the fund.

(b) At least quarterly, moneys received by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to the Electric Program Investment Charge for those programs the Public Utilities Commission has determined should be administered by the Energy Commission shall be forwarded by the Public Utilities Commission to the commission for deposit in the fund.

(c) The Controller shall, as directed by the commission, disburse moneys in the fund for
 purposes of this chapter.

(d) The commission may use moneys in the fund for the administration of this chapter, as authorized by the Public Utilities Commission and appropriated by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 97.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

25711.5.

In administering moneys in the fund for research, development, and demonstration programs under this chapter, the commission shall develop and implement the Electric Program Investment Charge (EPIC) program to do all of the following:

(a) Award funds for projects that will benefit electricity ratepayers and lead to either of the following:

(1) Technological advancement and breakthroughs to overcome the barriers that prevent the achievement of the state’s statutory energy goals and that result in a portfolio of projects that is strategically focused and sufficiently narrow to make advancement on the most significant technological challenges that shall include, but not be limited to, energy storage, renewable energy and
 its integration into the electrical grid, energy efficiency, integration of electric vehicles into the electrical grid, and accurately forecasting the availability of renewable energy for integration into the electrical grid.

(2) Technological advancements to reduce the costs of building electrification, including by reducing or avoiding costs of expanding electrical service and electrical panel upgrades for existing buildings.

(b) In consultation with the Treasurer, establish terms that shall be imposed as a condition to receipt of funding for the state to accrue any intellectual property interest or royalties that may derive from projects funded by the EPIC program. The commission, when determining if imposition of the proposed terms is appropriate, shall balance the
 potential benefit to the state from those terms and the effect those terms may have on the state achieving its statutory energy goals. The commission shall require each reward recipient, as a condition of receiving moneys pursuant to this chapter, to agree to any terms the commission determines are appropriate for the state to accrue any intellectual property interest or royalties that may derive from projects funded by the EPIC program.

(c) Require each applicant to report how the proposed project may lead to technological advancement and potential breakthroughs to overcome barriers to achieving the state’s statutory energy goals.

(d) Take into account, when applicable, the adverse localized health impacts of proposed projects to the greatest extent possible.

(e) Establish a process for tracking the progress and
 outcomes of each funded project, including an accounting of the amount of funds spent by program administrators and individual grant recipients on administrative and overhead costs and whether the project resulted in any technological advancement or breakthrough to overcome barriers to achieving the state’s statutory energy goals.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, prepare and submit to the Legislature no later than April 30 of each year an annual report in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code that shall include all of the following:

(1) A brief description of each project for which funding was awarded in the immediately prior calendar year, including the name of the recipient and the amount of the award, a description of how the project is thought to lead to technological advancement or breakthroughs to overcome barriers to achieving the
 state’s statutory energy goals, and a description of why the project was selected.

(2) A brief description of each project funded by the EPIC program that was completed in the immediately prior calendar year, including the name of the recipient, the amount of the award, and the outcomes of the funded project.

(3) A brief description of each project funded by the EPIC program for which an award was made in the previous years but that is not completed, including the name of the recipient and the amount of the award, and a description of how the project will lead to technological advancement or breakthroughs to overcome barriers to achieving the state’s statutory energy goals.

(4) Identification of the award recipients that are California-based entities, small businesses, or businesses owned by women, minorities, or
 disabled veterans.

(5) Identification of which awards were made through a competitive bid, interagency agreement, or sole source method, and the action of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) for each award made through an interagency agreement or sole source method.

(6) Identification of the total amount of administrative and overhead costs incurred for each project.

(7) A brief description of the impact on program administration from the allocations required to be made pursuant to former Section 25711.6, including any information that would help the Legislature determine whether to reauthorize those allocations beyond June 30, 2023.

(8) A brief description of each project for which follow-on funding was awarded in the immediately prior calendar year, including the amount of follow-on funding awarded for the project and the method and criteria used to select that project.

(g) Establish requirements to minimize program administration and overhead costs, including costs incurred by program administrators and individual grant recipients. Each program administrator and grant recipient, including a public entity, shall be required to justify actual administration and overhead costs incurred, even if the total costs incurred do not exceed a cap on those costs that the commission may adopt.

(h) (1) Use a competitive bid as the preferred method to solicit project applications and award funds pursuant to the EPIC program, except as
 specified in paragraphs (2) and (4).

(2) (A) The commission may use a sole source or interagency agreement method to noncompetitively award funding for a project if the project has a reasonable cost, the project satisfies one or more of the criteria described in subdivision (f) of Section 25620.5, and both of the following conditions are met:

(i) The commission, at least 60 days before making an award pursuant to this subdivision, notifies the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the relevant policy committees in both houses of the Legislature, in writing, of its intent to take the proposed action.

(ii) The Joint Legislative Budget Committee either approves or does not disapprove the proposed action within 60 days from the date of notification required by clause (i).

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact this paragraph to ensure legislative oversight for awards made on a sole source basis, or through an interagency agreement.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, standard terms and conditions that generally apply to contracts between the commission and any entities, including state entities, do not automatically preclude the award of moneys from the fund through the competitive bid method.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may award, through a noncompetitive method, follow-on funding for projects that meet all of the following requirements:

(i) The project is eligible to receive an award of funds from the EPIC program.

(ii) The project has been funded, at least in part, through the EPIC program.

(iii) The project has a prime recipient that is located in California.

(iv) The project will spend a minimum of 80 percent of its funding from the program in California.

(v) The project has received funding for the original project or technology through a competitive bid process from a state or federal agency.

(vi) The project has demonstrated significant results under its previous award.

(vii) The project has technology breakthrough potential that can enable the state to achieve its statutory energy policy goals on or ahead of schedule.

(viii) The project can address near-term priorities impacting the electricity sector and its ratepayers, such as mitigating wildfires and reducing the occurrence of deenergization events.

(ix) Absent follow-on funding, the project would experience a gap in funding that would likely prevent the technology from achieving significant advancement, negatively impact the ability of the project to attract sufficient private investment, or prevent the project’s commercialization and associated sales revenue.

(x) The project has not previously received follow-on funding through a noncompetitive method.

(B) The commission shall approve any award of follow-on funding at a business meeting.

(C) Follow-on
 funding is not subject to the requirements of paragraph (2).

(D) A project’s follow-on funding shall not exceed the project’s most recent competitively bid award through the EPIC program.

(E) The commission may adopt guidelines for follow-on funding awards. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the adoption of these guidelines.

(F) This paragraph shall become inoperative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 15, Sec. 6.   (SB 127)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25711.7.

(a) The Public Utilities Commission shall not require the collection of funds pursuant to its Decision 12-05-037 (May 24, 2012), Phase 2 Decision Establishing Purposes and Governance for Electric Program Investment Charge and Establishing Funding Collections for 2013–2020, as corrected by Decision 12-07-001 (July 3, 2012), Order Correcting Error, and as modified by Decision 13-04-030 (April 18, 2013), Order Modifying Decision (D.) 12-05-037, and Denying Rehearing of Decision, as Modified, in an annual amount greater than the amount specified in those decisions.

(b) This section does not modify, alter, or, in any way, affect the operation of Section 25712.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 356, Sec. 23.   (SB 96)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25711.8.

For a project related to the deployment of a microgrid, a recipient of moneys awarded pursuant to this chapter shall not expend those moneys for the purchase of diesel generators, including diesel backup generators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 476, Sec. 2.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

25711.9.

(a) The commission shall consider, in the investment planning process for the Electric Program Investment Charge (EPIC) program, funding for eligible biomass conversion, as defined in Section 40106, to energy projects using new and emerging technologies that maximize ratepayer and public benefits.

(b) In determining the appropriate amount of EPIC funding for biomass conversion, the commission shall consider the recommendations of the State Air Resources Board and the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection, and shall coordinate with the Natural Resources Agency, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, and the Department of Food and Agriculture about the need for biomass conversion.

(c) The commission shall also consider opportunities to reduce short-lived climate pollutant emissions, generate carbon negative emissions, reduce wildfire impacts, and increase energy reliability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 229, Sec. 2.   (AB 322)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25712.

This chapter does not authorize the levy of a charge or any increase in the amount collected pursuant to any existing charge, nor does it add to, or detract from, any existing authority of the Public Utilities Commission to levy or increase charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 39, Sec. 97.   (SB 1018)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.2. Strategic Fuel Reserve [25720. - 25721.]

25720.

(a) By January 31, 2002, the commission shall examine the feasibility, including possible costs and benefits to consumers and impacts on fuel prices for the general public, of operating a strategic fuel reserve to insulate California consumers and businesses from substantial short-term price increases arising from refinery outages and other similar supply interruptions. In evaluating the potential operation of a strategic fuel reserve, the commission shall consult with other state agencies, including, but not limited to, the State Air Resources Board.

(b) The commission shall examine and recommend an appropriate level of reserves of fuel, but in no event may the reserve be less than the amount of refined fuel that the commission estimates could be produced by the largest California refiner over a two week period. In making this examination and recommendation, the commission shall take into account all of the following:

(1) Inventories of California-quality fuels or fuel components reasonably available to the California market.

(2) Current and historic levels of inventory of fuels.

(3) The availability and cost of storage of fuels.

(4) The potential for future supply interruptions, price spikes, and the costs thereof to California consumers and businesses.

(c) The commission shall evaluate a mechanism to release fuel from the reserve that permits any customer to contract at any time for the delivery of fuel from the reserve in exchange for an equal amount of fuel that meets California specifications and is produced from a source outside of California that the customer agrees to deliver back to the reserve within a time period to be established by the commission, but not longer than six weeks.

(d) The commission shall evaluate reserve storage space from existing facilities.

(e) The commission shall evaluate a reserve operated by an independent operator that specializes in purchasing and storing fuel, and is selected through competitive bidding.

(f) (1) Not later than January 31, 2002, the commission and the State Air Resources Board, in consultation with the other state and local agencies the commission deems necessary, shall develop and adopt recommendations for the Governor and Legislature on a California Strategy to Reduce Petroleum Dependence.

(2) The strategy shall include a base case forecast by the commission of gasoline, diesel, and petroleum consumption in years 2010 and 2020 based on current best estimates of economic and population growth, petroleum base fuel supply and availability, vehicle efficiency, and utilization of alternative fuels and advanced transportation technologies.

(3) The strategy shall include recommended statewide goals for reductions in the rate of growth of gasoline and diesel fuel consumption and increased transportation energy efficiency and utilization of nonpetroleum based fuels and advanced transportation technologies, including alternative fueled vehicles, hybrid vehicles, and high fuel efficiency vehicles.

(g) The studies required by this section shall be conducted in conjunction with any other studies required by acts enacted during the 2000 portion of the 1999–2000 Regular Session dealing with gasoline prices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 936, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25721.

The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the Governor, the Legislature, and the Attorney General by January 31, 2002. If the commission finds that it would be feasible to operate a strategic gas reserve to insulate California consumers and businesses from substantial, short-term price increases arising from refinery outages or other similar supply interruptions, the commission shall request specific statutory authority and funding for establishment of a reserve.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 936, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.3. State Vehicle Fleet [25722. - 25724.4.]

25722.

(a) On or before January 31, 2003, the commission, the Department of General Services, and the State Air Resources Board, in consultation with any other state agency that the commission, the department, and the state board deem necessary, shall develop and adopt fuel-efficiency specifications governing the purchase by the state of motor vehicles and replacement tires that, on an annual basis, will reduce petroleum consumption of the state vehicle fleet to the maximum extent practicable and cost-effective.

(b) In developing the specifications, the commission and the department shall jointly conduct a study to examine state vehicle purchasing patterns, including the purchase of after market tires, and to analyze the costs and benefits of reducing the energy consumption of the state vehicle fleet by no less than 10 percent on or before January 1, 2005.

(c) The study shall include an analysis of all of the following topics:

(1) Use of alternative fuels.

(2) Use of fuel-efficient vehicles.

(3) Costs and benefits of decreasing the size of the state vehicle fleet.

(4) Reduction in vehicle trips and increase in use of alternative means of transportation.

(5) Improved vehicle maintenance.

(6) Costs and benefits of using fuel-efficient tires relative to using retreaded tires, as described in the Retreaded Tire Program (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 42400) of Part 3 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code).

(7) The costs and benefits of purchasing high fuel efficiency gasoline vehicles, including hybrid electric vehicles, instead of flexible fuel vehicles.

(d) On or before January 31, 2003, and annually thereafter, the commission, the Department of General Services, and the State Air Resources Board, in consultation with any other state agency that the commission, the department, and the state board deem necessary, shall develop and adopt air pollution emission specifications governing the purchase by the state of passenger cars and light-duty trucks that meet or exceed California’s Ultra-Low Emission Vehicle (ULEV) standards for exhaust emissions (13 Cal. Code Regs. 1960.1).

(e) If the study described in subdivision (b) determines that lower cost measures exist that deliver petroleum reductions equivalent to applicable federal requirements governing the state purchase of passenger cars and light-duty trucks, the state shall pursue a waiver from those federal requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 912, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25722.5.

(a) Each state office, agency, and department shall review its vehicle fleet and, upon finding that it is fiscally prudent, cost effective, or otherwise in the public interest to do so, shall dispose of nonessential sport utility vehicles and four-wheel drive trucks in its fleet and replace these vehicles with more fuel-efficient passenger cars and trucks.

(b) To the maximum extent practicable, each state office, agency, and department that has bifuel natural gas,
 bifuel propane, and flex fuel vehicles in its vehicle fleet shall use the respective alternative fuel in those vehicles.

(c) The Director of General Services shall compile annually and maintain information on the nature of vehicles that are owned or leased by the state, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number of passenger-type motor vehicles purchased or leased during the year, and the number owned or leased as of December 31 of each year.

(2) The number of sport utility vehicles and four-wheel drive trucks purchased or leased by the state during the year, and the number owned or leased as of December 31 of each year.

(3) The number of alternatively fueled vehicles and hybrid vehicles purchased or leased by the state during the year, and the total number owned or leased as of December 31 of each year and their location.

(4) The locations of the alternative fuel pumps available for those vehicles.

(5) The justification provided for all sport utility vehicles and four-wheel drive trucks purchased or leased by the state and the specific office, department, or agency responsible for the purchase or lease.

(6) The number of sport utility vehicles and four-wheel drive trucks purchased or leased by the state during the year, and the number owned or leased as of December 31 of each year that are alternative fuel or
 hybrid vehicles.

(7) The number of light-duty trucks disposed of under subdivision (a).

(8) The total dollars spent by the state on passenger-type vehicle purchases and leases, categorized by sport utility vehicle and nonsport utility vehicle, and within each of those categories, by alternative fuel, hybrid, and other.

(9) The total annual consumption of gasoline and diesel fuel used by the state fleet.

(10) The total annual consumption of alternative fuels.

(11) On December 31, 2009, and annually thereafter, the Director of General Services shall also compile the total annual vehicle miles traveled
 by vehicles in the state fleet.

(d) Each state office, agency, and department shall cooperate with the Department of General Services’ data requests in order that the department may compile and maintain the information required in subdivision (c).

(e) As soon as practicable, but no later than 12 months after receiving the data, the information compiled and maintained under subdivision (c) and a list of those state offices, agencies, and departments that are not in compliance with subdivision (d) shall be made available to the public on the Department of General Services’ internet website.

(f) Beginning July 1, 2009, and every three years thereafter, the Director of General Services shall prepare a report on the information
 compiled and maintained pursuant to subdivision (c). The Director of General Services shall post that report on its internet website.

(g) Pursuant to Article IX of the California Constitution, this section does not apply to the University of California except to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make this section applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 152, Sec. 1.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25722.6.

(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2023, the Department of General Services shall maximize the purchase and availability of alternative fuel vehicles, such as battery electric vehicles, hydrogen fuel cell vehicles, and plug-in hybrid electric vehicles, in the state fleet by adopting a procurement method to evaluate those vehicles. The procurement method may evaluate those vehicles based only on cost or also on any environmental or energy benefits of those vehicles.

 (2) For the purchase of passenger vehicles and light-duty trucks powered solely by an internal combustion engine, the Department of General Services shall evaluate
 the cost and the environmental and energy benefits for potential procurement by state and local governments. The evaluations shall consider both of the following criteria:

(A) The reduction in emissions of greenhouse gases, air pollutant emissions, and petroleum use on a full fuel-cycle basis, to the extent possible, based on existing data available to the State Air Resources Board, the commission, or other reliable sources, including the California Strategy to Reduce Petroleum Dependence developed pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 25720 and the state plan to increase the use of alternative transportation fuels developed pursuant to Section 43866 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The total costs of ownership of the vehicle and life-cycle impacts.

(b) The Department of General Services shall revise its procedures for the procurement of state and local government vehicles based on the necessary performance specifications of the vehicles to perform the required work or tasks of the vehicles in the fleet. The Department of General Services shall establish vehicle “classes” depending on the required work or tasks and the necessary performance specifications.

(c) For the purpose of state fleet procurement, both of the following shall apply:

(1) Available vehicles powered solely by an internal combustion engine in individual classes shall be evaluated for purchase or lease using the method and criteria developed
 pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Vehicles shall be procured for use in the state fleet that meet all requirements established by the federal government, including, but not limited to, the federal Energy Policy Act of 1992, Public Law 102-486, if applicable.

(d) The Department of General Services shall evaluate vehicles for potential addition to the state and local fleets, as described in this section, on an annual basis, reflecting annual new vehicle availability.

(e) A vehicle capable of using alternative fuels shall be operated on those fuels to the maximum extent practicable unless alternative fuels are not readily available or other factors exist that may prevent the use of
 those fuels in the area in which the vehicle is used.

(f) The Department of General Services shall do both of the following:

(1) During the normal course of coordination and contracting with nearby fueling stations, provide information related to the alternative fuel vehicles in the state fleet and request the stations to provide a fuel supply to meet that demand.

(2) When replacing, retrofitting, or installing a fueling tank or infrastructure at a facility that fuels state vehicles, the Department of General Services shall consider requesting competitive bids for alternative fuel infrastructure that would meet the needs of vehicles used, or planned to be used, in that facility.

(g) Authorized emergency vehicles, as defined in Section 165 of the Vehicle Code, that are equipped with emergency lamps or lights, as described in Section 25252 of the Vehicle Code, are exempt from the requirements of this section.

(h) Each state office, agency, or department seeking to purchase or lease a sport utility vehicle or four-wheel drive vehicle shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Director of General Services or the entity that purchases or leases vehicles that the vehicle is required to perform an essential function of the office, agency, or department. If it is so demonstrated, priority consideration shall be given to the purchase or lease of an alternative fuel or hybrid sports utility vehicle or four-wheel drive vehicle.

(i) Pursuant to Article IX of
 the California Constitution, this section does not apply to the University of California except to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make this section applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 152, Sec. 2.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25722.7.

(a) In order to further achieve the policy objectives set forth in Sections 25000.5, 25722, and 25722.5, the Department of General Services, in consultation with the commission, shall establish a minimum fuel economy standard that is above the standard, as it existed on January 1, 2007, established pursuant to Section 3620.1 of the State Administrative Manual, for the purchase of passenger vehicles and light duty trucks for the state fleet that are powered solely by internal combustion engines using fossil fuels or that are powered by more than one source, such as nonplug-in hybrid electric vehicles. The minimum fuel economy standard required by this subdivision does not apply to plug-in hybrid electric vehicles or battery electric
 vehicles.

(b) All new state fleet purchases by the Department of General Services and any other state entities of passenger vehicles and light duty trucks that are powered solely by internal combustion engines using fossil fuels, or that are powered by more than one source, such as nonplug-in hybrid electric vehicles, shall meet the fuel economy standard established under subdivision (a). This subdivision does not apply to plug-in hybrid electric vehicles or battery electric vehicles.

(c) Authorized emergency vehicles, as defined in Section 165 of the Vehicle Code, and vehicles described in subdivision (h) of Section 25722.6, are exempt from this section.

(d) Vehicles that are purchased and modified for the following purposes
 are exempt from this section:

(1) To provide services by a state entity to an individual with a disability or a developmental disability, as defined under the statutes or regulations governing that state entity.

(2) As a reasonable accommodation for the known physical or mental disability, as defined in Section 12926 of the Government Code, of an employee.

(e) For purposes of this section, “state entities” includes all state departments, boards, commissions, programs, and other organizational units of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state government, the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California.

(f) This section shall not apply to the University of California except to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make that provision applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 152, Sec. 3.   (SB 1305)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25722.8.

(a) On or before July 1, 2009, the Secretary of the Government Operations Agency, in consultation with the Department of General Services and other appropriate state agencies that maintain or purchase vehicles for the state fleet, including the campuses of the California State University, shall develop and implement, and submit to the Legislature and the Governor, a plan to improve the overall state fleet’s use of alternative fuels, synthetic lubricants, and fuel-efficient vehicles by reducing or displacing the consumption of petroleum products by the state fleet when compared to the 2003 consumption level based on the following schedule:

(1) By January 1, 2012, a 10-percent reduction or displacement.

(2) By January 1, 2020, a 20-percent reduction or displacement.

(b) Beginning April 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, the Department of General Services shall prepare a progress report on meeting the goals specified in subdivision (a). The Department of General Services shall post the progress report on its Internet Web site.

(c) (1) The Department of General Services shall encourage, to the extent feasible, the operation of state alternatively fueled vehicles on the alternative fuel for which the vehicle is designed and the development of commercial infrastructure for alternative fuel pumps and charging stations at or near state vehicle fueling or parking sites.

(2) The Department of General Services shall work with other public
 agencies to incentivize and promote, to the extent feasible, state employee operation of alternatively fueled vehicles through preferential or reduced-cost parking, access to charging, or other means.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “alternatively fueled vehicles” means light-, medium-, and heavy-duty vehicles that reduce petroleum usage and related emissions by using advanced technologies and fuels, including, but not limited to, hybrid, plug-in hybrid, battery electric, natural gas, or fuel cell vehicles and including those vehicles described in Section 5205.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 144.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

25722.9.

(a) For purposes of this section, “alternatively fueled vehicles” means light-, medium-, and heavy-duty vehicles that reduce petroleum usage and related emissions by using advanced technologies and fuels, including, but not limited to, hybrid, plug-in hybrid, battery electric, natural gas, or fuel cell vehicles and including those vehicles described in Section 5205.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) The Department of General Services and the Department of Transportation shall develop and implement advanced technology vehicle parking incentive programs, to the extent feasible,
 in public parking facilities of 50 spaces or more operated by the Department of General Services and park-and-ride lots owned and operated by the Department of Transportation to incentivize the purchase and use of alternatively fueled vehicles in the state. These programs shall provide meaningful, tangible benefits for drivers of alternatively fueled vehicles. These incentives may include preferential spaces, reduced fees, and fueling infrastructure for alternatively fueled vehicles that use these parking facilities or park-and-ride lots.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 676, Sec. 2.   (AB 2583)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25722.11.

(a) Beginning December 31, 2025, at least 15 percent of newly purchased vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of 19,000 pounds or more purchased by the Department of General Services and other state entities for the state fleet shall be zero emission. Beginning December 31, 2030, at least 30 percent of newly purchased vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of 19,000 pounds or more purchased by the Department of General Services and other state entities for the state fleet shall be zero emission.

(b) This section does not apply to vehicles that have special performance requirements necessary for the protection of public safety, as defined by the Department of General Services.

(c) If, on or after December 31, 2026, the Department of General Services, in a public hearing, finds that it cannot meet the needs of the state while meeting the requirements of this section, the department shall disclose that finding at the hearing and shall notify the Legislature of the finding in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) Upon disclosure of a finding pursuant to subdivision (c), the Department of General Services shall take the following steps:
